Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 11.1 Statewide Grand Juries

12-11.1-1.
Statewide grand jury — Size and powers.

A statewide grand jury shall consist of not less than thirteen (13) nor more than twenty-three (23) persons. The jurisdiction of a statewide grand jury shall extend throughout the state and it may investigate and return indictments for crimes committed any place within the state. A statewide grand jury shall in all other respects possess the usual powers and duties of county grand juries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 221, § 4.

12-11.1-2.
Repealed.

12-11.1-3.
Statewide grand juries — Impaneling.

Whenever the attorney general makes application in writing, the presiding justice shall order the impaneling of a statewide grand jury to attend the superior court at any places and for any period, not exceeding eighteen (18) months, that he or she directs. The attorney general may apply for the impaneling of as many statewide grand juries as he or she deems necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 221, § 4; P.L. 1983, ch. 46, § 2.

12-11.1-4.
Composition — Secretary of state required to inform jury commissioner.

A statewide grand jury shall be selected at random from the names of all prospective grand jurors appearing on current lists compiled pursuant to chapter 9 of title 9. In selecting the jurors, the jury commissioner shall select from each county a number of grand jurors which shall bear to the total number of grand jurors to be selected the same proportion as the current number of voters from the county bears to the total current number of voters for the state as a whole. For purposes of this section, Providence and Bristol counties shall be considered one county, and the size of the statewide grand jury shall be considered as twenty-three (23) members; provided, the actual size of the statewide grand jury shall conform to the provisions of §

12-11-1

and Rule 6(a) of the Superior Court Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 221, § 4; P.L. 1977, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 324, § 1.

12-11.1-5.
When county grand jury in attendance.

A statewide grand jury may attend the superior court and exercise all of its powers in a county even though a regular county grand jury is simultaneously in attendance in the county. The attendance of a statewide grand jury at the same time as a county grand jury shall not affect or diminish the powers of a county grand jury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 221, § 4.

12-11.1-5.1.
Unlawful grand jury disclosure.

Any person who, when being a grand juror, a public prosecutor, a grand jury stenographer, a grand jury interpreter, a police officer or a peace officer guarding a witness in a grand jury proceeding, or a clerk, attendant, warden or other public servant having official duties in or about a grand jury room or proceeding, or a public officer or public employee, obtains information in his or her official capacity and intentionally discloses, prior to the report of the grand jury on the matter, to another the nature or substance of any grand jury testimony, or any decision, result, or other matter attending a grand jury proceeding which is required by law to be kept secret, except in the proper discharge of his or her official duties or upon written order of the court shall be guilty of grand jury disclosure. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a witness from disclosing his or her own testimony.

Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 277, § 1.